en: Tomme cheese from the French Bauges mountains
fr: Tome des Bauges

en: Mont d'Or, Mont d'Or cheeses, Vacherin cheese or Mont d'or cheese from cow's milk
xx: Mont d'Or
fr: Mont d'Or, vacherin du Haut-Doubs, Vacherin-Mont d'Or

en: Livarot, Livarot cheeses, Livarot cheese from cow's milk
xx: Livarot
de: Livarot
fr: Livarot, Livarots
hr: Livarot

en: Soft cheeses with washed rind, Soft-ripened cheeses with washed rind
de: Weichkäse mit gewaschener Rinde
fr: Fromages à pâte molle à croûte lavée
hr: Meki sirevi s opranom koricom
it: Formaggi molli a crosta lavata
nl: Zachte gewassen korstkazen

en: Stretched-curd cheeses, Pulled-curd cheeses, Plastic-curd cheeses
de: Filata, Brühkäse
fi: Kehrätyn juustomassan juustot, Venytetyn juustomassan juustot
fr: Fromages à pâte filée
hr: Rastegnuti sirevi
it: Pasta filata
nl: Geknede kazen

en: Cream cheeses, cream cheese
bg: Крема сирене
ca: Formatges cremosos
es: Quesos cremosos
fi: kermajuustot
fr: Fromages à la crème
he: גבינות שמנת
hr: Krem sirevi
hu: Krémsajtok
it: Formaggio spalmabile
ja: クリームチーズ
lt: Grietinėlės sūriai, grietinėlės sūris
nl: Roomkazen, Roomkaas
pl: Serki kremowe, Serek kremowy
ru: Крем-сыры

en: Fresh cheeses
de: Frischkäse
es: Queso fresco
fr: Fromages à pâte fraîche, Fromage frais
hr: svježi sir
it: Formaggi freschi
ja: フレッシュチーズ
lt: Švieži sūriai
nl: Verse kazen
pt: Queijos frescos

en: Brousse
xx: Brousse
es: Brousse
fr: Brousses
hr: Brousse

en: Cottage cheeses
af: Maaskaas
ar: جبن قريش
bg: Зърнесто сирене
cs: Cottage
da: Hytteost
de: Hüttenkäse
el: Τυρί κότατζ
es: Cottage
et: Kodujuust
eu: Gaztanbera
fa: پنیر کوتاژ
fi: Raejuusto
fr: cottage cheeses, fromages cottage
gl: Requeixo
he: קוטג'
hr: Svježi sirevi
id: Cottage
is: Kotasæla
ja: カッテージチーズ
jv: Kèju pondhok
ko: 코티지 치즈
lt: Grūdėta varškė
lv: Mājas siers
ms: Keju kotej
nl: Cottage cheeses, Hüttenkäsen
nn: Opplagd mjølk
no: Hytteost
pl: Cottage cheese
pt: Cottage
ru: Зернёный творог
sl: Zrnasta skuta
sv: Cottage cheeses, Keso
tr: Çökelek peyniri
uk: Кисломолочний сир
zh: 茅屋起司

en: Plain cottage cheeses
fr: Cottage cheeses nature
hr: Obične skute
nl: Cottage cheese natuur

en: Fruit cottage cheeses
fr: Cottage cheeses aux fruits
hr: Voćni svježi sirevi
nl: Cottage cheeses met vruchten

en: Herb cottage cheeses
fr: Cottage cheeses aux herbes aromatiques
hr: Biljni svježi sirevi
nl: Cottage cheeses met kruiden

en: Soft cheeses
da: Bløde oste
de: Weichkäse
es: Quesos blandos
fr: Fromages à pâte molle
it: Formaggi molli
nl: Zachte kazen
pt: Queijos macios
sv: Mjuka ostar

en: Soft cheeses with bloomy rind, white mold-rind cheese
ca: Formatges tendres amb crosta florida, Formatges amb crosta emmotllada blanca
es: Quesos blandos con corteza florecida
fi: Pehmeät ulkoa hometetut juustot
fr: Fromages à pâte molle à croûte fleurie
hr: Meki sirevi s rascvjetanom korom
hu: Lágysajtok penészes kéreggel
it: Formaggi a crosta fiorita
lt: Sūriai su baltuoju pelėsiu
nl: Witschimmelkazen

en: Carré de l'Est, Carré de l'Est cheeses, Carré de l'Est cheese from cow's milk
de: Carre de l'Est
fr: Carrés de l'Est, Carré de l'Est
hr: Carré de l'est

en: Soft cheese with a natural rind
de: Weichkäse mit Naturrinde
fr: Fromages à pâte molle à croûte naturelle
hr: Meki sir s prirodnom korom
it: Formaggio molle con una crosta naturale
nl: Zachte kazen met natuurlijke korst

en: Hard cheeses, Cooked pressed cheeses
bg: Твърди сирена
ca: Formatges cuinats i premsats
de: Gekochter gepresster Käse
es: Quesos cocidos prensados
fi: kypsennetyt prässätyt juustot
fr: Fromages à pâte pressée cuite, Fromage à pâte pressée cuite
hr: Tvrdih sireva
it: Formaggi a pasta pressata cotta
lt: Kietieji sūriai, Kietasis sūris
nl: Verhitte geperste kazen
pt: Queijos cozidos e premidos
ru: Варёный спрессованный сыр
zh: 硬质奶酪

en: Half-cooked pressed cheeses
de: Halbgekochter gepresster Käse
fr: Fromages à pâte pressée demi-cuite
hr: Polukuhani prešani sirevi
it: Formaggi pressati a mezza cottura
nl: Halfverhitte geperste kazen

en: Uncooked pressed cheeses
ca: Formatges premsats sense cocció
de: Ungekochter gepresster Käse
es: Quesos prensados sin cocer
fi: kypsentämättömät prässätyt juustot
fr: Fromages à pâte pressée non cuite, fromage à pâte pressée non cuite
hr: Nekuhani prešani sirevi
hu: Nyers préselt sajtok
it: Formaggi a pasta pressata cruda
nl: Onverhitte geperste kazen

en: Maasdam, Maasdam cheeses
xx: Maasdam
bg: Маасдам
de: Maasdamer
es: Maasdam, Queso Maasdam
fi: maasdam
fr: Maasdam
hr: Maasdam
it: Maasdam
ja: マースダムチーズ
nl: Maasdam, Maasdammer